test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0-didus_crawl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - didús[crawl] :
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       disdús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       dídús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       didús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [diìdús, daàdús]
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàdiìdús, dàdaàdús]
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       dasdús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàdasdús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       gididús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàgididús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       ts'ididús
    didús[crawl]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàts'ididús
